Spell/share/myspell/dicts/fo_FO.dic
afturferð/HIJL
afturhjól/KLM
afturkomuferð/HIJL
akbreyt/HIJL
aliráð/KM
altar/KLM
amerikuferð/HIJL
andstøðuumboð/KLM
antiyvirgangsdeild/HIJL
arbeiðsfólk/KLM
arbeiðstilboð/KLM
arbeiðsávísing/HJL
atferð/HIJL
atfinning/HJL
atsókn/J
avgald/KM
avgrund/H
aðalfundarboð/KLM
barn/KM
barnabók/J
barnasending/HJL
barnaverndarnevnd/HIJL
barnsburðarskipan/HIJL
barsilsfarloyvistíð/HIJL
barsilsskipan/HIJL
basaltavbjóðing/HJL
bein/KLM
bending/HJL
bergholsgerð/HIJL
biddaraferð/HIJL
bilferð/HIJL
bilframsýning/HJL
blaðboð/KLM
blótan/H
borg/HIJL
borðtennisborð/KM
braggorð/KLM
breyt/HIJLx
brúdleypsferð/HIJL
brúkaraumboð/KLM
burturferð/HJ
bussferð/HIJL
bygd/IJL
bygdarmál/KLM
bygdaráðsfund/I
byggilist/HIJL
byggiár/KLM
bátaútferð/HIJL
bók/J
bóndabygd/HIJL
bótarbein/KLM
bøn/HIJL
búnaðarnevnd/HIJL
býarskipanardeildbyggideild/HIJL
býarskipanarnevnd/HIJL
býgdarráð/KLM
býráðsfund/I
danmarkarferð/HIJL
dansiferð/HJ
deild/HIJL
deyðsboð/KLM
dreingjabarn/KM
dreymaferð/HIJL
dálkan/HIJL
dátuflyting/HJL
dós/HIJL
døgurðaboð/KLM
eftirlitsferð/HIJL
eftirlønaruppsparing/HJL
eftirskúlaætlan/HIJL
eindagsnámsferð/HIJL
endamál/KLM
eykafíggjarlóg/HIJL
eykajáttanarlóg/HIJL
eykajáttanaruppskot/KLM
eystanbygd/HIJL
fagnarboð/KLM
fann/I
farvælferð/HIJL
fatan/HIJL
felagsborð/KM
ferð/HIJLy
ferðslulóg/HIJL
fjakkaraferð/HIJL
fjal/I
fjallboð/KLM
fjølmiðlalóg/HIJL
flogforboð/KLM
flutningsmálaráð/KLM
flyting/HJLvw
fongsulsrevsing/HJL
forboð/KLM
forskip/KLM
fosturbarn/KM
fosturtøkulóg/HIJL
framleiðsludeild/HIJL
friðardeild/HIJL
frádrátt/I
fráflyting/HJL
fullveldisferð/HIJL
fullveldisætlan/J
fundarborð/KM
fyrisitingarlóg/HIJL
fyrstuferð/HJ
fíggjarlóg/HIJL
fíggjarmálaráð/KLM
føroyaferð/HIJL
føðingardagsbarn/KM
geyl/KLM
gikt/H
gjøgnumferð/HIJL
gjørð/J
gonguferð/HIJL
goymingarbarn/KM
grav/I
gravarferð/HIJL
grindaherferð/HIJL
grund/J
grundlóg/HIJL
grót/KM
gátt/HIJL
hall/I
hanagal/KLM
handtøkuboð/KLM
hatursferð/HIJL
havingarbarn/KM
havn/HIJL
heilsan/HIJL
heilsuráð/KLM
heimbygd/HIJL
heksalæknaframferð/HIJL
herdeild/HIJL
hersetingardeild/HIJL
himmalsferð/HIJL
hjálpardeild/HIJL
hjálparferð/HIJL
hold/KM
hugsan/HJ
hámarksferð/HJL
hár/KLM
hátíð/J
hópferð/HIJL
høll/J
inntøkuflyting/HJL
internetherferð/HIJL
jomfrúferð/HIJL
játtan/HJ
kanningarferð/HIJL
kapping/J
kirkjuráð/KLM
kisukáv/KLM
kjarnorkuspreinging/HJL
kjarnorkuvápn/KLM
kjølbreyt/HIJL
klippiútgerð/H
kommunustýrisfund/I
konuráð/KLM
koyribreyt/HIJL
krabbameinsdeild/HIJL
kreppufund/I
kunningarherferð/HIJL
kvøld/KLM
køksborð/KM
kúgan/HIJL
landsfund/I
landsliðsferð/HIJL
leik/IKM
leikferð/HIJL
leið/J
leysingabarn/KM
liggingarferð/HIJL
listaferð/HIJL
ljósferð/HIJL
lokalsamfelag/KM
loysn/J
líkningarráð/KLM
lóg/HIJL
lótir/I
løn/HIJL
lønarflyting/HJL
meiningakanning/HJL
menningarferð/HIJL
mentanardeild/HIJL
mentanartilboð/KLM
meðalferð/HIJL
miðsavning/HJL
mynd/HIJL
mál/KLM
navn/KM
nevnd/HJ
noregsferð/J
námsferð/HIJL
náttarferð/HIJL
ogn/J
ommubarn/KM
orðing/HJL
oyðimarkarferð/HIJL
pallborðsfund/I
pappír/KLM
peningaflyting/HJL
próvtal/KM
punktum/KLM
páskaferð/HIJL
rannsóknarferð/HIJL
revsilóg/HIJL
roknskap/I
roynd/J
rulliborð/KM
rundferð/HIJL
ránsferð/HIJL
rættferð/HIJL
ræðsluherferð/HIJL
ríðingarbreyt/HIJL
rúmdarferð/HIJL
sagnorð/KLM
samferðsludeild/HIJL
samstarvsferð/HIJL
sekund/KLM
sendiferð/HIJL
setursskúlaferð/JL
siglingsferð/HIJL
sjeymílaferð/I
sjóferð/HIJL
sjólóg/HIJL
sjúklingaferð/HIJL
skattalóg/HIJL
skeikl/KLM
skemdaratferð/HIJL
skipsboð/KLM
skjútsferð/HIJL
skriviamboð/KLM
skurðdeild/HIJL
skálkaskjól/KLM
skíð/HIJL
skúlaborð/KM
skúlarundferð/HIJL
skúlaskeið/HIJL
smábygd/HIJL
sofaborð/KM
sponn/J
stjórn/HJ
stjórnarskipan/J
stovn/KM
stýringaramboð/KM
summarferð/HIJL
sunnudagsskúlaútferð/HIJL
súkklubreyt/HIJL
tak/KLM
tilboð/KLM
tilflyting/HJL
tjóð/IJL
trongd/HJ
trygdarumboð/KLM
tálg/H
tídd/HIJL
tíðindafund/I
tíðindasending/HJL
tónleikaútferð/HIJL
tøkubarn/KM
umboðsnevndarfund/I
umhvørvisdeild/HIJL
umhvørvisráð/KLM
undirvísingartilboð/KLM
upplýsingarherferð/HIJL
uppreisn/H
uttanlandsferð/IJL
vallaraferð/HIJL
varðferð/HIJL
veg/IKM
venjingarferð/IJL
verð/HIJL
veður/G
vindferð/HIJL
vinnulívsumboð/KLM
vápnalóg/HIJL
váðaferð/HIJL
yndisbarn/KM
yvirflyting/HJL
yvirtøkulóg/HIJL
álitisumboð/KLM
álv/HIJL
áseting/J
ásjón/HIJL
ætt/IJL
ævintýr/KLM
íslandsferð/HIJL
ólavsøkuferð/HIJL
øld/J
útjaðarabygd/HIJL
